Washington statutes.
RCW 36.96.070

Dissolved special purpose district—Disposition of property.

Any moneys or funds of the dissolved special purpose district and any moneys or funds received by the board of trustees from the sale or other disposition of any property of the dissolved special purpose district shall be used, to the extent necessary, for the payment or settlement of any outstanding obligations of the dissolved special purpose district. Any remaining moneys or funds shall be used to pay the county legislative authority for all costs and expenses incurred in the dissolution and liquidation of the dissolved special purpose district. Thereafter, any remaining moneys, funds, or property shall become that of the county in which the dissolved special purpose district was located. However, if the territory of the dissolved special purpose district was located within more than one county, the remaining moneys, funds, and personal property shall be apportioned and distributed to each county in the proportion that the geographical area of the dissolved special purpose district within the county bears to the total geographical area of the dissolved special purpose district, and any remaining real property or improvements to real property shall be transferred to the county within whose boundaries it lies. A county to which real property or improvements to real property are transferred under this section may, but does not have an obligation to, use the property or improvements for the purposes for which the dissolved special purpose district used the property or improvements and the county does not assume the obligations or liabilities of the dissolved special purpose district as a result of the transfer unless the county expressly assumes such obligations or liabilities through the adoption of a resolution.

[ 2020 c 179 s 4; 2001 c 299 s 13; 1979 ex.s. c 5 s 7.]